pt-BR: Ficha técnica do alimento: Seco; Fresco; Congelado; Grãos; Moído; Pó; Preservado; Folhas; Não tratado/cru; Integral; Outro
lt-LT: Maisto produkto pavidalas: Džiovinti produktai; Švieži produktai; Šaldyti produktai; Granulės; Malti produktai; Pudra; Konservuota; Lakštai; Neapdorota / žalia; Nepjaustytas; Kita
nb: Form på matvareprodukt: Tørket; Fersk; Frossen; Granulat; Bakke; Pulver; Bevart; Ark; Ubehandlet/rå; Hel; Annen
de: Form des Lebensmittelprodukts: Getrocknet; Frisch; Gefroren; Granulat; Boden; Puder; Konserviert; Blätter; Unbehandelt/Roh; Ganz; Sonstiges
ja: 食料品の形態: ドライ; 生鮮; 冷凍; 顆粒; グラウンド; パウダー; 保存された; シート; 未処理/生; 全体; その他
th: รูปแบบผลิตภัณฑ์อาหาร: อบแห้ง; สด; แช่แข็ง; เม็ดเล็ก; พื้นดิน; แบบผง; พรีเซิร์ฟ; แผ่น; ไม่ผ่านการชุบ/ดิบ; ทั้งชิ้น; อื่นๆ
en: Food product form: Dried; Fresh; Frozen; Granules; Ground; Powder; Preserved; Sheets; Untreated/Raw; Whole; Other
zh-CN: 食品产品形态: 干燥的; 新鲜; 冷冻; 颗粒; 落地式; 粉末; 保鲜; 床单; 未加工/生鲜; 全脂; 其他
fi: Ruokatuotemuoto: Kuivattu; Tuore; Jäätynyt; Rakeet; Jauhettu; Jauhe; Säilötty; Levyt; Käsittelemätön/Raaka; Kokonainen; Muu
ru: Форма выпуска продукта: Сушеный; Свежий; Замороженный; Гранулы; Молотый; Порошок; Консервированный; Листы; Необработанный/сырой; Цельный; Другой
tr: Gıda ürünü formu: Kurumuş; Taze; Dondurulmuş; Granüller; Toz; Pudra; Korunmuş; Kağıtlar; İşlemsiz/Ham; Tüm; Diğer
hu: Élelmiszer formája: Szárított; Friss; Fagyasztott; Granulátum; Őrölt; Púder; Konzervált; Lapok; Kezeletlen/nyers; Egész; Egyéb
es: Forma de producto alimenticio: Seco; Fresco; Congelado; Gránulos; Molido; Polvo; Preservado; Hojas; Sin tratar/En bruto; Entero; Otros
nl: Vorm voedingsproduct: Gedroogd; Vers; Bevroren; Korrels; Grond; Poeder; Behouden; Bladen; Onbehandeld/ruw; Geheel; Andere
bg-BG: Форма на хранителния продукт: Изсушена; Прясна; Замразена; Гранули; Смляна; Пудра; Запазено; Листове; Необработено/сурово; Цяла; Други
zh-TW: 食物商品形式: 乾燥; 清新; 冷凍; 顆粒; 地面; 粉末; 妥善保存; 薄片; 未處理/天然; 全部; 其他
pt-PT: Ficha do produto alimentar: Desidratado; Fresco; Congelado; Granulados; Moído; Pó; Conservado; Folhas; Não tratado/cru; Gordo; Outro
fr: Forme de l’aliment: Séché; Frais; Congelé; Granulés; Sol; Poudré; Conservé; Feuilles; Non traité/brut; Entier; Autre
vi: Mẫu sản phẩm thực phẩm: Khô; Tươi mới; Đông lạnh; Các hột nhỏ; Ống tên đặt đất; Bột; Được bảo quản; Tờ; Chưa xử lý/Thô; Nguyên; Khác
ko: 식품 형태: 건조; 신선; 냉동; 과립; 그라운드; 가루; 방부 처리됨; 시트; 무처리/미가공; 전체; 기타
hr-HR: Oblik prehrambenog proizvoda: Suho; Svježe; Smrznuto; Granule; Mljeveno; Prah; Konzervirano; Listovi; Netretirano/sirovo; Cjelovito; Ostalo
ro-RO: Formă produs alimentar: Alimente uscate; Alimente proaspete; Înghețat; Granule; Măcinată; Pudră; Conservat; Foi; Netratat / brut; Integral; Altele
sv: Livsmedelsproduktform: Torkad; Frisk; Fryst; Granulat; Mald; Pulver; Bevarad; Ark; Obehandlad/Rå; Hel; Annat
pl: Forma produktu spożywczego: Wysuszona; Świeży; Mrożony; Granulki; Uziemienie; Proszek; Konserwa; Arkusze; Nieprzetworzony/surowy; Całe; Pozostałe
da: Fødevareproduktform: Tørret; Frisk; Frosset; Granulater; Jord; Pulver; Bevaret; Ark; Ubehandlet/rå; Hel; Andet
sl-SI: Oblika izdelka z živili: Posušeno; Sveže; Zamrznjeno; Granule; Zmleto; Prašek; Konzerviran; Lističi; Neobdelana; Cel; Drugo
cs: Forma potraviny: Zaschlé; Čerstvé; Mražené; Granule; Země; Prášek; Konzervované; Listy; Nezpracované/syrové; Celé; Jiné
sk-SK: Forma potravinárskeho výrobku: Sušený; Čerstvý; Zmrazený; Granule; Mletý; Práškový; Konzervované; Listy; Nespracované/surové; Celý; Iné
el: Μορφή διατροφικού προϊόντος: Αποξηραμένο; Φρέσκο; Παγωμένο; Κόκκοι; Αλεσμένος; Σκόνη; Διατηρημένο; Φύλλα; Ακατέργαστο; Πλήρες; Άλλο
it: Formato del prodotto cibo: Essiccato; Fresco; Congelato; Granuli; Terreno; Polvere; Conservato; Fogli; Non trattato; Intero; Altro